Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.110

Public restrooms—Model notice on human trafficking—Voluntary posting—Report to legislature.

(1) Every establishment that maintains restrooms for use by the public may voluntarily, upon availability of the model notice as described in subsection (2) of this section, post a notice that complies with the requirements of this section in a conspicuous place within all restrooms of the establishment in clear view of the public and employees. The office of crime victims advocacy may work with businesses and other establishments and with human trafficking victim advocates to adopt policies for the placement of such notices.

(2)(a) The model notice that may be voluntarily posted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be in a variety of languages and include toll-free telephone numbers a person may call for assistance, including the number for the national human trafficking resource center and the number for the Washington state office of crime victims advocacy.

(b) The office of crime victims advocacy shall review and approve the initial form and content of the model notice to ensure the notice is appropriate for public display and likely to be an effective communication to reach human trafficking victims. The office of crime victims advocacy shall review the model notice on a yearly basis to ensure the information provided remains accurate.

(3) The cost of production, printing, and posting of the model notices shall be paid by a participating nonprofit at no cost to the state.

(4) The office of crime victims advocacy must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2016, regarding the voluntary participation in this effort.

[ 2015 c 273 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 273: See note following RCW 7.68.370.

Human trafficking informational posters at rest areas: RCW 47.38.080.